apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="Stewarde/ß__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Stewarde/ß__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssen</l>      <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="St/orch__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>örchen</l>    <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orches</l>    <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orch</l>      <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orch</l>      <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orch</l>      <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orchs</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="St/orch__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>örchen</l>    <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orche</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orches</l>    <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orch</l>      <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orch</l>      <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orch</l>      <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orchs</l>     <r>orch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Str/auch__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>äuchern</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äucher</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äucher</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äucher</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auche</l>     <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auches</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auchs</l>     <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Str/auch__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>äuchern</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äucher</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äucher</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äucher</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auche</l>     <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auches</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auchs</l>     <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auch</l>      <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Str/auß__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>außen</l>     <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äußen</l>     <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äuße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äuße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äuße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auße</l>      <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>außes</l>     <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auß</l>       <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auß</l>       <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auß</l>       <r>auß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Stewardeß">       <i>Stewarde</i><par n="Stewarde/ß__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Stewardeß">       <i>stewarde</i><par n="Stewarde/ß__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Storch">          <i>St</i><par n="St/orch__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Storch">          <i>st</i><par n="St/orch__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Strauch">         <i>Str</i><par n="Str/auch__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Strauch">         <i>str</i><par n="Str/auch__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Strauß">          <i>Str</i><par n="Str/auß__n_m"/></e>
